Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.070

Bonds—Legal investments.

Bonds issued under this chapter are hereby made securities in which all insurance companies, trust companies in their commercial departments, savings banks, cooperative banks, banking associations, investment companies, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.

[ 2002 c 365 s 9.]